Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-203
Compulsory attendance; necessarily employed children; permit.

In case the services or earnings of a child are necessary for his or her own support or the support of those actually dependent upon him or her and the child is fourteen years of age or more and not more than sixteen years of age and has completed the work of the eighth grade, the person having legal or actual charge of such child may apply to the superintendent of the primary high school district in which the child resides or a person designated in writing by the superintendent. The superintendent or designee may, in his or her discretion, issue a permit allowing such child to be employed.

Laws 1921, c. 52, § 1(c), p. 227;

C.S.1922, § 6508b;

Laws 1927, c. 84, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 92, § 1, p. 348;

C.S.1929, § 79-1902;

Laws 1931, c. 149, § 1, p. 405;

Laws 1941, c. 163, § 1, p. 650;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1902;

R.S.1943, § 79-1905;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 11, p. 694;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-205;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 24.

For provisions relating to child labor, see Chapter 48, article 3.